Washington statutes.
RCW 9.45.070

Mock auctions.

Every person who shall obtain any money or property from another or shall obtain the signature of another to any writing the false making of which would be forgery, by color or aid of any false or fraudulent sale of property or pretended sale of property by auction, or by any of the practices known as mock auction, shall be punished by imprisonment in a state correctional facility for not more than five years or in the county jail for up to three hundred sixty-four days, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars, or by both fine and imprisonment.

Every person who shall buy or sell or pretend to buy or sell any goods, wares or merchandise, exposed to sale by auction, if an actual sale, purchase and change of ownership therein does not thereupon take place, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 96 s 6; 1992 c 7 s 10; 1909 c 249 s 378; RRS s 2630.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2011 c 96: See note following RCW 9A.20.021.

Auctioneering without license: RCW 36.71.070.

Auctioneers: Chapter 18.11 RCW.